Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Chapter 6. Community Services for Persons With Disabilities.

§§ 51.5-23 through 51.5-30.

Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 60.

Cross references.

For current provisions related to Community-Based Services for People with Disabilities, see §

51.5-161

for awarding of grants; see §

51.5-162

for independent living services; see §

51.5-163

for centers for independent living; see §

51.5-164

for Statewide Independent Living Council; see §

51.5-166

for eligibility criteria; see §

51.5-167

for participation by clients in cost of services; see §

51.5-168

for rights of clients; see §

51.5-169

for cooperative agreements with community services boards and schools.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, in enactment clauses 59 through 71, eliminated the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services, transferring powers and duties to the newly created Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services. For comparable sections see §

51.5-116

et seq. Where appropriate the historical references and case notes to former provisions have been transferred to the new provisions.

Former § 51.5-30 was also amended by Acts 2012, cc. 476 and 507. Pursuant to § 30-152, the Virginia Code Commission has directed that effect be given to that amendment in §

51.5-169

.